Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3466.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 62 O.S. 2021, Section 195, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 195. A. 1. There is hereby created a petty cash fund
at each of the following institutions: Oklahoma School for the
Blind, Muskogee, Oklahoma; Oklahoma School for the Deaf, Sulphur,
Oklahoma; Griffin Memorial Hospital, Norman, Oklahoma; Eastern State
Hospital, Vinita, Oklahoma; Northern Oklahoma Resource Center of
Enid, Enid, Oklahoma; Southern Oklahoma Resource Center of Pauls
Valley, Pauls Valley, Oklahoma; Western State Psychiatric Center,
Fort Supply, Oklahoma; Central Oklahoma Juvenile Treatment Center,
Tecumseh, Oklahoma; L.E. Rader Children's Diagnostic and Evaluation
Center, Sand Springs, Oklahoma; L.E. Rader Intensive Treatment
Center, Sand Springs, Oklahoma; the Southwest Oklahoma Juvenile
Center, Manitou, Oklahoma; the Office of Juvenile Affairs' Boys'
Group Home, Enid, Oklahoma; the Office of Juvenile Affairs' Boys'
Group Home, Lawton, Oklahoma; the Office of Juvenile Affairs' Girls'
Group Home, Tulsa, Oklahoma; the Oklahoma Medical Center; and the
J.D. McCarty Center for Children with Developmental Disabilities.
2. The Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise
Services and the head of the institution involved are hereby
authorized and it shall be their duty to fix the maximum amount of

the petty cash funds. The Director of the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services shall prescribe all forms, systems, and
procedures for administering the petty cash funds of the
institution.
B. 1. There is hereby created a petty cash fund in the legal
division of the Department of Human Services which fund shall be
used solely to pay court costs, filing fees, witness fees, and
expenses related to any case or proceeding within the responsibility
of the legal division.
2. There is hereby created a petty cash fund in the Child
Support Enforcement Division of the Department of Human Services.
The fund shall be used solely to pay litigation expenses, including
court costs, filing fees, witness fees, and expenses related to any
case or proceeding within the responsibility of the Child Support
Enforcement Division.
3. The Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise
Services and the Director of the Department of Human Services are
hereby authorized and it shall be their duty to fix the maximum
amount of the petty cash funds. The Director of the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services shall prescribe all forms,
systems, and procedures for administering the petty cash funds.
C. 1. There is hereby created a petty cash fund in the finance
department of the Corporation Commission which shall be used solely
to pay litigation expenses of the legal division, including court
costs, filing fees, witness fees, and other expenses related to any
case, proceeding, or matter within the responsibility of the legal
division.
2. The Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise
Services and the Corporation Commission are hereby authorized and it
shall be their duty to fix the maximum amount of the petty cash
fund, not to exceed Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00). The Director of
the Office of Management and Enterprise Services shall prescribe all
forms, systems, and procedures for administering the petty cash
fund.
D. 1. There is hereby created a petty cash fund for the
Property Distribution Division of the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3466 Page 2

2. The amount of the Property Distribution petty cash fund
shall not exceed Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00). The initial amount
shall be drawn by warrant from the State Surplus Property Revolving
Fund. The Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise
Services is authorized to prescribe forms, systems and procedures
for the administration of the Property Distribution petty cash fund.
E. D. 1. There is hereby created a petty cash fund in the
legal division of the Oklahoma Health Care Authority which fund
shall be used solely to pay for court costs, filing fees, witness
fees, and expenses related to any case or proceeding within the
responsibility of the legal division.
2. The Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise
Services and the Chief Executive Officer of the Oklahoma Health Care
Authority are hereby authorized and it shall be their duty to fix
the maximum amount of the petty cash fund, not to exceed Five
Hundred Dollars ($500.00). The Director of the Office of Management
and Enterprise Services shall prescribe all forms, systems, and
procedures for administering the petty cash fund.
F. E. 1. The Director of the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services is hereby authorized, upon request by the State
Commissioner of Health, to establish a petty cash fund for the State
Department of Health in an amount not to exceed One Thousand Dollars
($1,000.00), to be used for the purpose of making change for persons
obtaining licenses, paying fees and fines, and transacting other
such business with the Department.
2. The fund shall be established and replenished from any
monies available to the Department for operating expenses.
3. The Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise
Services shall prescribe all forms, systems, and procedures for
administering the fund.
G. F. 1. There is hereby created a petty cash fund for the
Financial Management section of the Department of Environmental
Quality in an amount not to exceed Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) to
be used for the purpose of making change for persons obtaining
licenses, paying fees and fines and transacting other such business
with the Department.
2. The fund shall be established and replenished from any
monies available to the Department for operating expenses.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3466 Page 3

3. The Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise
Services shall prescribe all forms, systems and procedures for
administering the fund.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3466 Page 4

Passed the House of Representatives the 5th day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 5th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 3466 Page 5